sk-SK: Typ prevodovky: Automatický; CVT; Dvojspojkový; Manuálny; Tiptronic; Iné
fi: Voimansiirtotyyppi: Automaattinen; CVT; Kaksoiskytkin; Manuaalinen; Tiptronic; Muu
it: Tipo di trasmissione: Automatico; CVT; Doppia frizione; Manuale; Tiptronic; Altro
ko: 변속기 유형: 자동; CVT; 듀얼 클러치; 수동; 팁트로닉; 기타
nb: Transmisjonstype: Automatisk; CVT; Dobbel clutch; Manuell; Tiptronic; Annet
ro-RO: Tip transmisie: Automată; CVT; Ambreiaj dublu; Manual; Tiptronică; Altele
tr: İletim Türü: Otomatik; CVT; Çift kavramalı; Manuel; Tiptronik; Diğer
fr: Type de transmission: Automatique; CVT; Double embrayage; Manuel; Tiptronique; Autre
en: Transmission type: Automatic; CVT; Dual-clutch; Manual; Tiptronic; Other
sv: Transmissionstyp: Automatisk; CVT; Dubbelkoppling; Manuell; Tiptronic; Övrigt
th: ประเภทการส่ง: อัตโนมัติ; CVT; คลัตช์คู่; มือเข็น; ทิปโทรนิก; อื่นๆ
nl: Versnellingsbaktype: Automatisch; CVT; Dubbele koppeling; Handmatig; Tiptronic; Andere
hr-HR: Vrsta transmisije: Automatsko; CVT; Dvostruka spojka; Ručno; Tiptronic; Ostalo
cs: Typ převodového systému: Automatický; CVT; Dvouspojka; Ruční; Tiptronic; Jiné
hu: Sebességváltó típusa: Automatikus; CVT; Kettős tengelykapcsolós; Manuális; Tiptronic; Egyéb
lt-LT: Pavarų dėžės tipas: Automatinis; CVT; Dviguba sankaba; Rankinis; „Tiptronic“; Kita
vi: Loại truyền: Số tự động; CVT; Ly hợp kép; Xe lăn thủ công; Số sàn; Khác
pl: Typ przekładni: Automatyczny; CVT; Dwusprzęgłowa; Ręczny; Tiptronic; Inne
pt-BR: Tipo de transmissão: Automática; CVT; Embreagem dupla; Manual; Tiptronic; Outro
pt-PT: Tipo de transmissão: Automático; CVT; Embraiagem dupla; Manual; Tiptronic; Outro
es: Tipo de transmisión: Automático; CVT; Doble embrague; Manual; Tiptronic; Otros
el: Τύπος μετάδοσης: Αυτόματος; CVT; Διπλού συμπλέκτη; Μη αυτόματος; Tiptronic; Άλλο
bg-BG: Тип трансмисия: Автоматичен; CVT; Двоен съединител; Ръчен; Типтроник; Други
zh-CN: 传输类型: 自动的; CVT; 双离合; 手动; 蒂普特罗尼克电子变速箱; 其他
de: Übertragungstyp: Automatisch; CVT; Doppelkupplung; Manuell; Tiptronic; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 傳動裝置類型: 自動; 無段變速箱; 雙離合器; 手動; 手動/自動一體化變速箱; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta menjalnika: Samodejno; CVT; Dvosklopčni menjalnik; Ročno; Tiptronsko; Drugo
ja: 伝送方式: オートマチック; CVT; デュアルクラッチ; 手動; ティプトロニック; その他
da: Transmissionstype: Automatisk; CVT; Dobbeltkobling; Manuel; Tiptronic; Andet
ru: Тип коробки передач: Автоматический; Вариатор; Двойное сцепление; Ручной; Tiptronic; Другой